



Weathernews Inc. | Services



















Our Global Mobile Content Service constantly changes the way people interact with the weather. Because the mobile phone is the world's most "personal" media device, it is only natural that the weather information provided can be tailored to suit the needs of the individual no matter when or where. For Weathernews, it's all about transforming weather information into a service which both matches the needs of the individual and exceeds their expectations.

From large commercial jetliners to helicopters, weather is a critical element which needs to be addressed at the operational level. Our SKY Service helps airlines improve their operations, including; flight planning, pilot briefings, and flight monitoring, which considers the weather risk at the time of flight plan creation. These SKY services cover passenger and cargo transportation, fire-fighting, disaster prevention, crop dusting, and aviation photography.

For over 50 years Weathernews has been the leader in providing risk communications services to the international shipping business and the marine industry. Weathernews currently supports international shipping companies from 12 countries with safe and efficient weather routing. Our track record and continued focus on developing new services ensures that Weathernews will continue to be the leading provider of weather services to the marine transportation industry along the concept of Total Fleet Management Service.

We provide companies carrying out sea- and coastal-based work projects with powerful support to ensure that work is done safely and efficiently. Our precise information targets specified sea areas and route areas, while our RC Service (Risk Communication Service: a consulting service for weather and hydrographic conditions) is tailored to each operational phase. Our coverage is not limited to the seas around Japan, but extends to worldwide areas such as the Chinese continental shelf, Southeast Asia, the North Sea, the Caspian Sea, the Gulf of Mexico and the Sakhalin coast.

With the rapid advance in information technology, retailers can get information about the sales results for each product and the number of customers at the stores by using the sales data from POS system. Our advanced service, can be customized for customers, to help analyze the correlation between the seasonal fluctuations of the temperature and product sales. Understanding this relationship allows retailers to improve their ordering system and better manage product inventory. This service, which has been introduced in the major convenient stores and many GMS (General Merchandise Store), is broadly expanding to the various industries such as clothing, food, drug stores, and many others.

Weathernews employs several different types of media to provide real-time weather information and weather-related lifestyle information to consumers that we like to think of as our "supporters" (whether individuals or the population at large). Weathernews is a vertically-integrated content provider that handles all the work involved in planning, producing and distributing content. Our supporters can access content through any of the several different media (the "channels" through which content is distributed). The management and operation of Weathernews content is based on a "trans-media" approach that lets our supporters receive content through the most convenient medium for them. "For the supporters, with the supporters" is the concept we use to describe our basic philosophy––which is bringing weather content to our supporters via our own media channels 24 hours a day, 365 days a year.

Our road management support service provides road managers and road-maintenance companies working for national and local governments with snow, ice and other crucial weather information, to help ensure road safety and efficient snow/ice clearing and plowing.

It is a fact that weather-induced natural disasters cause incalculable cost not only to our daily lives but also to our country's infrastructure and business activities. Weathernews has developed a base set of solutions called DIMINISH which contribute to reducing the impact of natural disaster to people. By providing accurate and timely weather analysis to public agencies, organizations or corporate entities involved in disaster relief or prevention, Weathernews can significantly improve the quality of information required. Our service helps in both the preventive and the relief decision_making process which is vital when weather_induced natural disasters occur.

Weather information (both current conditions and forecasts) and accompanying disaster information for train routes and the surrounding areas is important for railway companies. To ensure safety and service punctuality, railway companies need a reliable source of information that is more detailed than that obtained from regular radio or TV weather forecasts, including information on weather changes along train routes and the latest information on weather conditions. R Service provides weather-related support for disaster response, line-maintenance work, transport control, and all of the many different operations performed by railway companies. The service is designed to help ensure optimum transport and line-maintenance operations. 

Weather is fundamental to the travel and recreational industry.  Millions can be lost in the holiday season if the weather does not perform so it pays to plan ahead. Client safety and comfort is the basis for a good travel experience.  Accurate and reliable weather forecast information provides the knowledge needed to ensure that clients are kept happy.Weathernews provides comprehensive assistance to businesses in the travel and recreational industries, thus helping them to bring about the highest level of safety, comfort, and enjoyment.

Weather can have a profound effect on a sporting event.  The proper use of weather can even help determine who wins or looses the game.Sporting events are fun.  But care must be taken to make sure they don’t turn into disaster as the result of a change in weather.  In some situations rain, wind, snow or lightning can suddenly plunge what should be an enjoyable sporting event into a dangerous situation.  Weathernews can help mitigate this risk with accurate forecasts tailored to your sporting needs.

Weathernews' expertise is in helping business to better understand the economic impact of the weather, and providing information, analysis and services to help mitigate weather risk.  Weathernews can help you identify and analyze the impact of weather risk through an in-depth analysis of weather trends as well as forecasting services.We can help your business learn from the past, manage the present and plan for the future.  

By providing accurate weather forecasts Weathernews can help clients supply safe and economical energy supply.Energy demand varies greatly due to seasonal and daily weather variations.  Weathernews can help predict when abnormal weather conditions will produce strain on power supplies.  Weathernews forecasts can also be used to minimise downtime due to damaged power lines or pipelines allowing you to have response teams ready to restore services as quickly as possible.

Weather conditions can present major concerns for both operators and managers of plant operations.To ensure a safe and productive factory management environment ‘decision makers’ need to have the best weather information available.Weathernews just doesn’t provide a weather forecast.Weathernews provides a forecast which integrates with your factory requirements to ensure that you can plan ahead and minimize the affects that adverse weather can have on your business.

Weathernews analyses primary and secondary weather events that can lead to health issues.This is achieved by monitoring and observing individuals whose health is affected by sudden changes in the weather around them. Individuals report their conditions and findings are considered.The ‘health awareness weather system’ is then shared with our 1.3 million mobile subscribers.



















Weathernews Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis



























Sales and support:
        +44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
        +1 732 587 5005 (US)
info@marketpublishers.com





Business & Finance






Finance Services
Banking
Cards
Credit & Loans
Financial Company Reports
Investment
Mortgage
Payment
Other Financial Services


Insurance
General Insurance
Health Insurance
Insurance Company Reports
Life Insurance
Property Insurance
Reinsurance
Auto Insurance


Business Services
Accounting & Tax Services
Advertising
Brokerage
Business Support
Business Services Company Reports
Consulting
Diversified Services Company Reports
Franchise
Wealth Management


Company Reports
Business Survey
Real Estate





Retail






Retail


Consumer Goods


Food & Beverage







Industry

Chemicals

IT & Technology

Life Sciences

Services



About
Faq
 My Cart


 











Market Reports
Press-Releases
Events
About Us
Terms & Conditions
Customer FAQ




Market Research Reports

Business & Finance

Business Services

Business Services Company Reports





Weathernews Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis





Date:
June 15, 2017



Pages:
30


Price:




US$ 200.00




License             [?]:


Single User - US$ 200.00
Corporate License - US$ 400.00




Publisher:
datamining


Report type:
Strategic Report


Delivery:

E-mail Delivery (PDF)


ID:
WE63D8A9985B1EN



        Leaflet:
    

Download PDF Leaflet






















Abstracts
Contents
List of Tables
List of Figures





Weathernews Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results.

Scope

Business Description – A detailed description of the company’s principal activities.
Locations, Subsidiaries, Associated Companies – A list of key locations, subsidiaries and associated companies of Weathernews Inc. with contact details.
Milestones and History – An overview of the major events associated with the company.
Key Employee Information – A list of Weathernews Inc. key executives and their brief biographies.
Major Products and Services – A list of major products, services and brands of the company.
SWOT Analysis – An in-depth analysis of the company’s Strengths, Weakness, Opportunities and Threats.
Financial Analysis - Updated info on income statement, balance sheet and cash flows key figures; main financial ratios and capital market snapshot.
Key Competitors – A list of key Weathernews Inc. competitors.
Latest News – Company related news bulletins.



1 WEATHERNEWS INC. - OVERVIEW

1.1 Weathernews Inc. - Business Description
1.2 Weathernews Inc. - Locations, Subsidiaries, Associated Companies
1.3 Weathernews Inc. - Milestones and History

2 WEATHERNEWS INC. - KEY EMPLOYEE INFORMATION

3 WEATHERNEWS INC. - OWNERSHIP AND MAJOR HOLDERS

4 WEATHERNEWS INC. - MAJOR PRODUCTS AND SERVICES

5 WEATHERNEWS INC. - SWOT ANALYSIS

5.1 Weathernews Inc. - Strengths
5.2 Weathernews Inc. - Weaknesses
5.3 Weathernews Inc. - Opportunities
5.4 Weathernews Inc. - Threats

6 WEATHERNEWS INC. – FINANCIAL ANALYSIS

6.1 Weathernews Inc. - Financial Snapshot
6.2 Weathernews Inc. – Stock Market Snapshot

7 WEATHERNEWS INC. - KEY COMPETITORS

8 WEATHERNEWS INC. - LATEST NEWS 

APPENDIX

About datamining
Sources and Methodology
Ratio Definitions
Disclaimer

You will receive the report in 24 hours after the purchase as it takes one business day to update it so you can get the most recent data available.



LIST OF TABLES

Table 1: Weathernews Inc. Key Facts 
Table 2: Weathernews Inc. Offices and Representations 
Table 3: Weathernews Inc. Milestones and History 
Table 4: Weathernews Inc. Key Executives 
Table 5: Weathernews Inc. Key Executives Biographies 
Table 6: Weathernews Inc. Major Shareholders 
Table 7: Weathernews Inc. Products and Services
Table 8: Weathernews Inc. SWOT Analysis
Table 9: Weathernews Inc. Profitability 
Table 10: Weathernews Inc. Management Effectiveness
Table 11: Weathernews Inc. Income Statement Key Figures 
Table 12: Weathernews Inc. Balance Sheet Key Figures 
Table 13: Weathernews Inc. Cash Flow Key Figures 
Table 14: Weathernews Inc. Capital Market Snapshot 



LIST OF FIGURES

Figure 1: Weathernews Inc. Operating Margin Chart 
Figure 2: Weathernews Inc. Profit Margin Chart 
Figure 3: Weathernews Inc. Return on Assets (ROA) Chart
Figure 4: Weathernews Inc. Return on Equity (ROE) Chart 
Figure 5: Weathernews Inc. Debt to Equity Chart 
Figure 6: Weathernews Inc. Current Ratio Chart 
Figure 7: Weathernews Inc. 1-year Stock Chart 
Figure 8: Weathernews Inc. 5-year Stock Chart
        
        
Skip to top




MORE PUBLICATIONS


Matsuya Foods Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages


E-Commerce China Dangdang Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages


Fidelity Systems PLC - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages


Xpro India Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages


Intergroup Financial Services Corp - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Jun, 2017 · 30 pages








Ask Your Question
Weathernews Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis







Company name*:



Contact person*:



Phone/fax*:



Email*:




 Request invoice


Your enquiry:




				Please click on a Check Box below to confirm you are not a robot:
					


























Market Reports


All Categories  Financial Services Banking Cards Credit & Loans Financial Company Reports Investment Mortgage Payment Other Financial Services  Insurance General Insurance Health Insurance Insurance Company Reports Life Insurance Property Insurance Reinsurance Auto Insurance  Business Services Accounting & Tax Services Advertising Brokerage Business Support Business Services Company Reports Consulting Diversified Services Company Reports Franchise Wealth Management  Real Estate Real Estate Company Reports  Business Survey 












Sales and support:
                    +44 20 8123 2220
            +1 732 587 5005
info@marketpublishers.com
  © 2006-2016 MarketPublishers.com


About Us
Our Clients
Our Publishers
Customer FAQ


Market Reports
New Publications
Reports by Regions
Press-Releases


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Return Policy
Affiliate Program


Join as Publisher

Follow Us:






















Weathernews Inc.
































1 July, 2014
Weathernews with others to Develop
	Next-Generation Auto Logistics Solutions


Weathernews Inc. (head office: Chiba; president: Chihito Kusabiraki) have agreed to team with Nippon Yusen Kabushiki Kaisha (head office: Tokyo; president: Yasumi Kudo), Monohakobi Technology Institute (head office: Tokyo; president: Makoto Igarashi) , NYK Business Systems Co., Ltd. (head office: Tokyo; president: Toshiaki Takeda) and Kozo Keikaku Engineering Inc. (head office: Tokyo; president: Shota Hattori) on the joint development of next-generation solutions using state-of-the-art technology in the auto logistics field.
	
 
The effort has been given the name “Symphony Project” and will aim to create new value in the auto logistics supply chain and offer next-generation solutions for our customers under the slogan ”Bringing value to customers by providing value-added services and solutions that feature unique logistics technologies.” The project will fuse NYK Group’s knowledge, on-site capabilities, and global network which NYK Group have been building up in global auto logistics business, with Weathernews’ innovative infrastructure network and its weather forecast technology, and with Kozo Keikaku Engineering’s cutting edge simulations that make use of advanced operations research techniques and data-analysis technology.
 
Through this Symphony Project focusing on development of new services for each ASEAN country whose auto logistics demand is remarkably expanding, we are first moving to offer our new "Garuda" value-added services suitable to the local logistics situations in Indonesia, which is rapidly becoming the largest car market among the ASEAN countries.
 
Examples of development solutions include the following:
 

Environmental assessments of transport and risk assessments
Systems allowing visualization of complex transport processes
Monitoring services using peculiar weather observation infrastructure
Analysis of logistics process and inventory optimizing simulation
Optimization of car's yard (seamless service that includes planning,designing, operation, and improvements)

 
Weathernews contribution to the Symphony Project will be the maximum application of the knowledge and acumen gained from many years supporting Japan’s highway and logistics markets. Starting with Indonesia, Weathernews is actively advancing weather risk communication services we provide, and expanding our innovative network of sensory infrastructure throughout Asia.
 
 
Outline of each company
About Kozo Keikaku Engineering Inc.


EstablishedMay 6, 1959


Head Office4-38-13 Honcho, Nakano-ku, Tokyo


RepresentativeShota Hattori


Description of businessEngineering consulting, systems solutions, product services


 
About Monohakobi Technology Institute


EstablishedApril 1, 2004


Head Office2-3-2 Marunouchi, Chiyoda-ku, Tokyo


RepresentativeMakoto Igarashi


Description of businessEnvironmental conservation and energy-saving technology, ship-operating technology, consultation on quality transport, logistics solutions


 
About NYK Business Systmes Co., Ltd.


EstablishedApril 1, 1988


Head Office1-17-21 Shinkawa Chuo-ku, Tokyo


RepresentativeToshiaki Takeda


Description of businessKnow-how about computers and communication; databases; computer-system planning, development and operation; etc.


 
About Weathernews Inc.


EstablishedJune 11, 1986


Head Office1-3 Nakase, Mihama-ku, Chiba


RepresentativeChihito Kusabiraki


Description of businessCountermeasures based on weather forecasts, weather information for mobile phones, Internet, TV, and radio








 








Plat'Home ｜Product｜OpenBlocks IoT BX1G























Plat'Home ｜Product｜OpenBlocks IoT BX1G


Home|Product|Contact|About us











Corporate Profile





Corporate Name
Plat'Home Co., Ltd.


Offices

Corporate Headquarters

Nihon Building Kudan Bekkan 3rd floor
Kudan-kita 4-1-3, Chiyoda-ku, Tokyo, 102-0073, Japan
E-mail:sales@plathome.com



Home Page

http://www.plathome.co.jp/
http://www.plathome.com/ (Global Site) 



Date of Establishment
March 23, 1993


Capital
1,197 million yen (March 2017)


Net Sales
1,133 million yen　(For the year ended March 31, 2017)


President
Tomoyasu Suzuki


Number of Employees
43　(March 2017)




Clients
Business




Artiza Networks, Inc.
BIOS CORPORATION
COMSQUARE Co., Ltd.
ComZeit, INC.
CTCSP Corporation
DAIWABO INFORMATION SYSTEM CO., LTD. 
DDS, Inc.
DeNA Co., Ltd.
DISCO Corporation
FAMILYNET・JAPAN CORPORATION 
Firstserver, Inc.
FUJI SOFT INCORPORATED
Fuji Xerox Co., Ltd.
FUJITSU BROAD SOLUTION & CONSULTING Inc.
FUJITSU CoWorCo LIMITED
FUJITSU FSAS INC.
Fujitsu Marketing Limited
FUJITSU NETWORK SOLUTIONS LIMITED 
Fujitsu Systems East Limited
FURUNO ELECTRIC CO., LTD.
Hitachi ICT Business Services, Ltd.
Hitachi Solutions, Ltd.
Hitachi Systems, Ltd.
Hitachi, Ltd.
ITOCHU Techno-Solutions Corporation
KDDI CORPORATION
KDDI R&D Laboratories Inc.
Kyoritsu Electric Corporation
MARUBENI INFORMATION SYSTEMS CO.,LTD.
Mitsubishi Space Software Co.,Ltd.
MITSUI KNOWLEDGE INDUSTRY CO., LTD.
NDS Co.,Ltd. 
NEC Corporation
NEC Fielding,Ltd.
NEC Management Partner, Ltd.
NEC Networks & System Integration Corporation
Net One Systems Co., Ltd.
NetIRD Inc.
Networld Corporation
NHK (Japan Broadcasting Corporation)
NHK Global Media Services, Inc.
NHK Media Technology, Inc.
NIHON DENKEI Co.,Ltd. 
Nihon Unisys, Ltd.
Nomura Research Institute, Ltd.
NS Solutions Corporation
NTT (Nippon Telegraph and Telephone Corporation)
NTT Advanced Technology Corporation
NTT Communications Corporation
NTT Comware Corporation
NTT DATA Corporation
NTT DOCOMO, INC.




NTT East (NIPPON TELEGRAPH AND TELEPHONE EAST CORPORATION)
NTT Electronics Corporation
NTT Software Corporation
NTT West (NIPPON TELEGRAPH AND TELEPHONE WEST CORPORATION)
NTT-ME Corporation
OMRON Corporation
OTSUKA CORPORATION
Panasonic Corporation
Panasonic Mobile Communications Co., Ltd. 
Recruit Holdings Co.,Ltd.
RICOH Company, Ltd.
Ryoyo Electro Corporation
SCSK Corporation
SecuAvail Inc.
SGI Japan, Ltd.
SHIMIZU CORPORATION
Skeed Co. Ltd.
SoftBank Commerce & Service Corp.
SoftBank Technology Corp.
SoftBank Telecom Corp.
SOFTCREATE CORP.
SoftEther Corporation 
Softfront
Soliton Systems K.K.
Sony Corporation
Sumitomo Chemical Co., Ltd.
Sumitomo Electric System Solutions Co., Ltd.
Sumitomo Precision Products Co., Ltd.
SYNNEX Infotec Corporation
Systena Corporation
TAMA TOSHIBA INFORMATION EQUIPMNTS CO.,LTD
TOHO CINEMAS LTD.
TOKYO BROADCASTING SYSTEM TELEVISION, INC.
Tokyo Electric Power Company, Incorporated
TOSHIBA BUSINESS & LIFE SERVICE CORPORATION
TOSHIBA CORPORATION
TOSHIBA INFORMATION SYSTEMS (JAPAN) CORPORATION
Toshiba Solutions Corporation
Toyota InfoTechnology Center Co., Ltd.
Trion Corporation
UNIADEX, Ltd.
WEATHERNEWS INC.
Wintechno Company.
Yahoo Japan Corporation
YAMAHA CORPORATION
Yokogawa Electric Corporation
Zabbix Japan LLC




Academic / Government




AIST (National Institute of Advanced Industrial Science and Technology)
Central Research Institute of Electric Power Industry
Chiba University
Hiroshima University
Hokkaido University
Japan Agency for Marine-Earth Science and Technology
Japan Science and Technology Agency
JAXA (Japan Aerospace Exploration Agency)
JETRO (Japan External Trade Organization)
JWA (Japan Weather Association)
Keio University
KEK (High Energy Accelerator Research Organization)
Kitasato University
Kobe University
Kyoto University
Kyushu Institute of Technology
Kyushu University
Mie University
Nagoya Institute of Technology
Nagoya University
Nara Institute of Science and Technology




Nara Women's University
National Institute for Environmental Studies
National Institute of Informatics
National Institute of Information and Communications Technology
National Institute of Polar Research
National Institutes of Natural Sciences
National Maritime Research Institute
Nihon University
Okayama University
Osaka University
RIKEN
Sapporo Gakuin University
The University of Electro-Communications
The University of Tokyo
Tohoku University
Tokyo Denki University
Tokyo Institute of Technology
Tokyo Metropolitan University
Tokyo University of Science 
Toyo University
University of Tsukuba
Waseda University













Home

Product

OpenBlocks IoT BX1G


Contact

About us



© 1999- Plat'Home Co., Ltd. All rights reserved.




























Business Services Company Research Reports


























Sales and support:
        +44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
        +1 732 587 5005 (US)
info@marketpublishers.com





Business & Finance






Finance Services
Banking
Cards
Credit & Loans
Financial Company Reports
Investment
Mortgage
Payment
Other Financial Services


Insurance
General Insurance
Health Insurance
Insurance Company Reports
Life Insurance
Property Insurance
Reinsurance
Auto Insurance


Business Services
Accounting & Tax Services
Advertising
Brokerage
Business Support
Business Services Company Reports
Consulting
Diversified Services Company Reports
Franchise
Wealth Management


Company Reports
Business Survey
Real Estate





Retail






Retail
Cash & Carry
Convenience Stores
Department Stores
Duty Free
Hypermarkets & Supermarkets
Online Retail
Retail Company Reports
Service Station Retail
Specialist Store
Wholesale 

Consumer Goods
Consumer Products Company Reports
Cosmetics & Hygiene Products
Furnishing
Jewelry & Accessories
Household Products
Pet Products
Sporting Goods & Equipment
Stationery
Textile & Leather
Tobacco
Toys & Games 

Food & Beverage
Alcoholic Drinks
Soft Drinks
Food
Food & Beverage Company Reports







Industry






Agriculture
Agribusiness
Agricultural Products
Animal Husbandry
Fisheries
Fertilizers
Gardening & Forestry

Construction
Building Materials
Building Products Company Reports
Commercial Construction
Engineering & Construction Services Company Report
Industrial construction
Infrastructure
Residential Construction


Energy
Alternative Energy
Batteries & Accumulators
Electric Power
Energy Company Reports
Nuclear Power
Smart Grid
Thermal Power

Metallurgy
Alkali Metals
Ferrous Metallurgy
Metal Alloys
Metal products
Metals & Mining Company Reports
Non-Ferrous Metallurgy
Precious Metals
Rare-Earth Metals
Uranous Metals (Actinoid)


Mineral Raw Materials
Building Raw Materials & Fillers
Conglomerates Company Reports
Fossil Fuel
Nonmetallic Minerals
Metalloids
Ores
Precious & Semi-Precious Stones


Machinery & Equipment
Defence & Security
Packaging Industry
Publishing Industry
Pulp & Paper
Vehicle
Other Industries






Chemicals






Organic Chemicals
Alcohols
Alkenes (Olefins)
Ethers
Organic Acids & Derivatives
Aldehydes & Ketones
Amines
Halogenated
Polymers
Alkanes
Benzene & Derivatives
Isocyanates


Inorganic Chemicals
Alkali
Inorganic Salts
Non-Metallic Oxides
Inorganic Acids
Metal Oxides


Chemical Company Reports
Chemical Reports by CAS Number
Composite Materials
Oils & Lubricants






IT & Technology






Consumer Electronics
Audio & Video Equipment
GPS Navigation
Mobile Phones & Smartphones
PC & Notebooks
Photography


Hardware
Computer Hardware
Computers & Electronic Equipment Company Reports
Data Storage
Networking Hardware


Software
Application Software
Operating System
Programming Software
Software Development
Software & Technology Services Company Reports
Video Games


Telecommunications
Broadband
Communication Services Company Reports
Internet
Mobile
Networks
Telecom Equipment
Wireless Technology






Life Sciences






Medical Devices
Anesthesia & Respiratory
Cardiovascular Devices
Dental
Diabetes Care
Diagnostic Equipment
Drug Delivery
Endoscopy
Ear, Nose & Throat (ENT)
Healthcare Equipment/Supplies Company Reports
Implants
Neurology
Orthopedic
Ophthalmic
Surgical Equipment
Wound Closure
Other Medical Devices


Biotechnology
Biomarkers
Biomaterials
Biosimilars
Stem Cell

Diagnostics & Diseases
In Vitro Diagnostics
Incontinence
Cancer
Cardiovascular
Diabetes
Hepatitis


Healthcare
Healthcare Services Company Reports
Ear Care
Eye Care
Hospital
Medicated Skin Care
Therapy
Wound Care


Pharmaceuticals
Clinical Trial
Drug Stores
Drugs
Pharmaceuticals Company Reports
Vaccines

Medical Products
Veterinary






Services






Freight & Trucking
Air Freight
Freight & Trucking Company Reports
Rail Freight
Road Freight
Water Freight


Media & Entertainment
Casino and Gaming
Cinema & Theater
Magazine & Newspaper
Media Company Reports
Music
Social Media
Television & Radio


Food Service
Fast Food
Restaurants
Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports
Pub & Bar


Consumer Services
Education
Hotels
Legal Services
Logistics
Post & Courier
Recruitment
Rent
Sports & Fitness Center
Travel & Leisure
Other Services








About
Faq
 My Cart


 











Market Reports
Press-Releases
Events
About Us
Terms & Conditions
Customer FAQ




Market Research Reports

Business & Finance

Business Services

Business Services Company Reports








Business Services Company Research Reports


The business services industry encompasses specialized companies providing various types of business-related services to other firms. Business services can be classified into such types as accounting, marketing, security, advertising, internal audit, consulting, risk management, recruitment, finance, transportation, etc. 
The business services market is highly fragmented, so there are no noticeably dominant players able to control the industry. EA Consulting Asia Pacific, Sutherland Global Service, HTC Global Services, McKinsey, BCG are amid the most renowned players of the worldwide market. 
The catalogue “Business Services Company Reports” contains a raft of research studies devoted to players of the business services market. The reports offer in-depth examinations of the competitive landscape, present SWOT analyses, and review their performances.  The researches also contain valuable data on the companies’ owners, senior management, locations, subsidiaries, markets, product portfolios and history. The reports not only offer companies’ profiles, but also cover their business activities. Valuable data on M&As, new product launches and company news digest are available in the research studies, too.





All Regions
Global
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                            East Asia and Pacific
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                    --Australia
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                        --China
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                        --Hong Kong
                                                                                                                    --India
                                                                                --Indonesia
                                                                                                                                                        --Japan
                                                                                --South Korea
                                                                                                                                                                                            --Malaysia
                                                                                                                                                        --New Zealand
                                                                                                                                                        --Pakistan
                                                                                                                    --Philippines
                                                                                                                                                                                            --Singapore
                                                                                                                                                        --Sri Lanka
                                                                                                                                                        --Taiwan
                                                                                --Thailand
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                            

Business Services Company Reports


All Publishers BAC Industry Comparative Analysis
                        BAC SWOT Company Reports
                        Business Strategies Group
                        datamining
                        GlobalData
                        Timetric
                    



                            Found
                                 2950 publications                    



Zippi Networks, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zippi Networks, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zhongyuan Environment-Protection Co Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zhongyuan Environment-Protection Co Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zhonghui Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zhonghui Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zhejiang Guangbo Group Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zhejiang Guangbo Group Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zamage Digital Art Imaging, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zamage Digital Art Imaging, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yusen Logistics Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yusen Logistics Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yuasa Funashoku Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yuasa Funashoku Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Young Jin Infra CO., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Young Jin Infra CO., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


YouGov PLC - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
YouGov PLC - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


YouChange Holdings Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
YouChange Holdings Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yokohama Maruuo Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yokohama Maruuo Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yokohama Gyorui Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yokohama Gyorui Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yem Chio Co., Ltd - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yem Chio Co., Ltd - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yangjisa Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yangjisa Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Yamada Servicer Synthetic Office Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Yamada Servicer Synthetic Office Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Y-Entec Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Y-Entec Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xpress Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xpress Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xinyinhai Technology, Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xinyinhai Technology, Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Xerius Bioscience Ag - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Xerius Bioscience Ag - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WSP Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WSP Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


W.S. Industries Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
W.S. Industries Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WS Atkins plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WS Atkins plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Workforce Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Workforce Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Work Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Work Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Woobangland Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Woobangland Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WISE Group AB - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WISE Group AB - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Windswept Environmental Group, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Windswept Environmental Group, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WindPower Innovations, Inc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WindPower Innovations, Inc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wincanton plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wincanton plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wilson Learning Worldwide - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wilson Learning Worldwide - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Willy Food Investments Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Willy Food Investments Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wilhelmina International, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wilhelmina International, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Widetech Malaysia Bhd - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Widetech Malaysia Bhd - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Worldwide Food Services, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Worldwide Food Services, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Worldwide Auction Solutions, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Worldwide Auction Solutions, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WHK Group Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WHK Group Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Western Lucrative Enterprises, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Western Lucrative Enterprises, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


West Mountain Capital Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
West Mountain Capital Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wescorp Energy Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wescorp Energy Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wesco Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wesco Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wellcom Group Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wellcom Group Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wellco Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wellco Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Weathernews Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Weathernews Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wdb Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wdb Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WCA Waste Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WCA Waste Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Waterman Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Waterman Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Water Hall Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Water Hall Group plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Waste Management, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Waste Management, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Waste Connections Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Waste Connections Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Global Warming Solutions, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Global Warming Solutions, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages




1
2
3
4
5
>

Skip to top





Market Reports


All Categories  Financial Services Banking Cards Credit & Loans Financial Company Reports Investment Mortgage Payment Other Financial Services  Insurance General Insurance Health Insurance Insurance Company Reports Life Insurance Property Insurance Reinsurance Auto Insurance  Business Services Accounting & Tax Services Advertising Brokerage Business Support Business Services Company Reports Consulting Diversified Services Company Reports Franchise Wealth Management  Real Estate Real Estate Company Reports  Business Survey 






Need Help?

								+44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
				+1 732 587 5005 (USA)
info@marketpublishers.com







Sales and support:
                    +44 20 8123 2220
            +1 732 587 5005
info@marketpublishers.com
  © 2006-2016 MarketPublishers.com


About Us
Our Clients
Our Publishers
Customer FAQ


Market Reports
New Publications
Reports by Regions
Press-Releases


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Return Policy
Affiliate Program


Join as Publisher

Follow Us:



























Why Weathernews is  focusing on “environmental weather markets” this time – Weathernews Inc.








































































News



Tweet


 

Feb 03, 2017
Ceremony held in celebration of launching Weathernews France
Why Weathernews is  focusing on “environmental weather markets” this time
Energy  >
Logistics  >
Paris Office  >


Ceremony held in celebration of launching Weathernews FranceWeathernews has positioned the Energy, Consumer Product Goods & Retail, Supply Chain and Agricultural markets as “environmental weather markets” from 2017. Weathernews acquisition of Metnext SA (Metnext); European weather company on January 16th, pave the way for deploying Weathernews France services for “environmental weather markets” globally. On February 2nd, the Weathernews France launch ceremony was held, where 25 staff members from Weathernews France, Weathernews President & Representative Director Kusabiraki, and 5 members of the project team gathered together for the event. Everyone in attendance shared a vision for the future and strengthened their bonds of trust over a glass of champagne.25 staff from Weathernews France, Weathernews President & Representative Director Kusabiraki, and 5 members of the project teamLive connecting Weathernews France in Paris, Weathernews Global Center in Japan and other offices in Europe and USASpeech from Thomas Skov, Executive Officer of Weathernews Inc.With Weathernews France capabilities a new opportunity is opening up for our customers, our staff and our supporters. We will now have a 3rd leg on our solution offering, where previously we have been focusing only on providing high level solutions Shipping and Airline companies in Europe, we now have solutions that bring tangible value to both Energy, Consumer Goods, Supply Chain, and Agriculture companies. Not only customers in France will benefit from the solutions, also Weathernews customer and organization throughout Europe will be able to service and value creation.Thomas Skov, Executive Officer of Weathernews Inc.Until now, Weathernews has provided services in Japan for the Energy, Consumer Product Goods & Retail, Supply Chain and Agriculture industries. We asked the project leader, Mitsuhiro Ogata, why these are being positioned as “environmental weather markets” now, and why services will be developed in Europe instead of Japan.- First of all, what kind of markets do “environmental weather markets” refer to?Ogata:“Environmental meteorology weather markets” are markets that are affected by the environment or have an impact on the environment. For example, with energy, everyone uses heating when it is cold and air conditioning when it is hot. This results in an increase in electricity consumption, and power companies work hard to generate power to provide this electricity. That is, changes in the weather lead to changes in how people feel, and the impact on the environment is increased due to the consumption of fuel and emission of CO2 in that process. However, electricity essentially cannot be stored. Even if the effort is made to burn fuel to generate power, if the temperature does not fall as low as expected, people will not use their heating and the surplus electricity is discarded. The same applies in factory & retail because people’s preferences and consumption changes according to changes in the weather. If stock is unsold due to misreading the weather, it must be discarded, and waste disposal sites must operate to process the discarded items, resulting in a significant impact on the environment. It is the same in agriculture.Mitsuhiro Ogata, Environmental Weather Markets Leader, Weathernews France Establishment Project Leader- Until now, Weathernews has provided services to these markets in Japan, but why are you focusing on “environmental weather markets” this time around?Ogata:There are three key points behind this decision.The first is the increase in the need to reduce the impact on the environment using the weather. One part of the backdrop to this is the “Paris Agreement” aimed at reducing greenhouse gas emissions to zero by the end of the 21st century. In particular, Europe is moving with considerable speed to eliminate all waste. Eliminating waste could be rephrased as “not having excess inventory”. Electricity, food and crops all result in unnecessary consumption of fuel and the emission of greenhouse gases in the process of producing and disposing of excess inventory. Conversely, by understanding changes in the weather and climate and producing the optimal amount required by people, it is possible to reduce the environmental impact. There are heightened needs for the use of meteorological information because customers are directly faced with this issue particularly in “environmental weather markets”.The second key point is the relationship with “transportation weather markets”.Until now, we have supported “transportation weather markets” carrying materials using shipping, aviation, railways and road transportation. The cargo being carried by cargo ships and trucks is also “inventory in transport”. By utilizing our service know-how in transportation weather markets, we can support the overall optimization of the supply chain, including the inventory in transport of customers in environmental weather markets who are receiving transportation services.The third key point is the shift from fossil fuels to renewable energy such as solar and wind power that is progressing globally. Needless to say, this is significantly affected by the natural environment such as sunlight and wind, and detailed weather information is required for providing stable power generation and predicting the optimal balance of supply and demand. Furthermore, in order to construct new facilities such as offshore wind power, it is necessary to determine whether it is possible to safely transport materials and conduct work. We can utilize know-how such as that on logistics support and marine construction support which we have provided inside and outside Japan in the past.- Why did you acquire the French weather company Metnext and welcome it into the Weathernews Group as Weathernews France?Ogata:In order to launch our business in environmental weather markets, we formulated a strategy of starting from Europe where these are the most developed. To achieve this, we felt it was necessary to have a partner that is well-positioned and has business sense in these markets, rather than attempt to do it alone. In this context, we were fortunate to meet Mr. Patrice, who founded Metnext, and we found that they were providing services to the energy, factory & retail, and agriculture markets in Europe that we were focusing on. Also, one of the strengths of Weathernews is communication during navigation decision-making, etc. while Metnext’s strengths are in preliminary investigations and post-project evaluation, and we felt that we could create a relationship in which we utilize each other’s strengths to compensate for our current weaknesses. In addition, another key point was that they have a geographical advantage, and will be able to promote the Weathernews Group’s creation of partnerships in Europe. Their corporate philosophy to “help all people through weather” is extremely compatible with the Weathernews corporate philosophy of “help people when it matters” and this was a deciding factor for welcoming them to the Weathernews Group as Weathernews France.- What will the schedule for service development be?Ogata:The development of services is slated to be completed in 2017 while holding discussions with symbolic customers(*) representative of the respective markets in Japan and France. We would like them to be used by more customers from 2018. The key to service development is how we communicate with symbolic customers and create services that produce value for the market as a whole. Developing and deploying new services with a new partner is challenging for Weathernews. We want to clear each issue we face with “Co-growth” as our watchword, and provide new value to customers.*Symbolic customerA customer representative of a market that has built a long-standing partnership of “co-evolving and co-creating” with the Weathernews Group.Press release about the Acquisition of Metnext SA 
























Order Entry Specialist Resume Example (Weathernews, Inc) - Norman, Oklahoma






























 


  Menu  Close 
  LiveCareer  



 For Employers
 Contact Us
 Live Chat
 Log In
 Log In



Resume Builder 
 Resumes




Resume Examples
Resume Templates
Resume Samples
Resume Tips
Resume Services





JOB INDUSTRIES



Accounting & Finance
Admin
Business
Customer Service
Education




Engineering
Finance
Human Resources
IT
Law




Management
Media & Entertainment
Medical
Sales
Science




Retail
Marketing
Construction
Real Estate
Automotive




Production
Social Services
Transportation




 View All Job Industries  





JOB INDUSTRIES



Accounting & Finance
Business Templates
Classic Template
Computers Technology
Contemporary




Culinary Templates
Engineering Templates
Entry Level
Experienced
Management




Media Entertainment
Space Saver
Standard Template
Traditional
Traditional Template




IT
Customer Service
Sales
Education
Marketing




Retail
Medical
Finance
Microsoft Word
HR




 View All Job Industries  





JOB INDUSTRIES



Accountant
Analyst
Architect
Art
Bartender




Bookkeeper
Chef
Computer Science
Consultant
Engineering




Entry Level
Executive
Housekeeper
IT (Information Technology)
Manager




Military
Nursing
Receptionist
Resume Objectives
Retail




Sales
Server
Teacher
Technical
Resume Samples Guide




 View All Job Industries  





Featured Resume Tips





How to Include Keywords In Your Resume
Without strategically placing keywords in your resume, employers won't be able to find you.







Your Top 6 Resume Questions
See our customer's questions about how to write an effective, job-winning resume


Read More Resume Tips  

Resume Tips

How to Write Your First Resume
Best Resume Formats
Including References on Resume
Do's and Don'ts for Your Education Section
How to Write Your Resume Work Experience Section

View Other Resume Tips  



More Tips



  

Professional Resume Writing
Let us write it for you! Put the power of a professional resume writer on your side and get the job faster.



  

Resume Check
Make sure your resume is 100% error free! Instant feedback + make your resume recruiter ready.





  

Have a Pro Review Your Resume
Get an expert 2nd opinion with Resume Review. Professional advice will help you make your resume perfect so get you hired faster.



  

Professional Cover Letter Writing
Make the ultimate first impression with employers. Stand out from the crowd with a professionally written cover letter to match your resume.





 View Other Resume Services  







 Cover Letters




Cover Letter Builder
Cover Letter Examples
Letter Samples





COVER LETTER BUILER

  

Get your foot in the door with a stand-out cover letter
Your cover letter is your first change to impress potential employers. Cover Letter Builder gives you the tools to get noticed!
Create a Cover Letter  



COVER LETTER TIPS

  

Your Top 6 Resume Questions
See our customer's questions about how to write an effective, job-winning resume
Read Tips  





Cover Letter Job Industries



Education
Accounting & Finance
Customer Service
Management
Administrative




Marketing
Sales
Business
Medical
Healthcare




Media & Entertainment
IT (Information & Technology)




 See All Categories  





Letter Sample Categories



Cover Letters
Resignation Letters
Application Letters
Permission Letters
Termination Letters




Leave Letters
Appreciation Letters
Recommendation Letters
Thank You Letters
Appointment Letters




Reference Letters
Apology Letters




 See All Categories  







 Interviews




Interview Game Plan
Interview Videos
Interview Tips
Interview Questions





Interview Game Plan

  

Plan for Interview Success
Our proven solution is backed by a decade of research and has helped thousands get a job!
Learn more  



Free Video

  

3 Techniques To Answer Any Interview Question
Watch how you can answer any interview question and win the job!
Watch free video now 







Interview Videos

  

What's your greatest strength?
Interviewers will ask similar questions and gauge your response



  

How do you stay organized?
Hiring Managers want to learn how you get things done


View All Interview Videos  



Interview Categories

Common Questions
Good & Bad Answers
Good Answers Only
Bad Answers Only



Industries

Admin Support
Healthcare
Restaurant
Retail



View More Interview Preparations  







Job Interview Tips

  

Your First Ever Job Interview
10 tips that will help you have a successful first ever job interview.



  

What is your Biggest Failure?
Read how to properly interpret and answer this seemingly tricky question.





 View All Interview Tips  








Featured Interview Questions:

  

Why Are You The Best Candidate For This Position?
You want to make sure that you provide a clear and intelligible answer.



  

What Are Your Career Goals?
Make sure your goals line up with what you would be doing in their company.





 See All Interview Questions  







 Jobs




Search Jobs
Job Tips







Job Search Top Cities



Austin
Chicago
Dallas
Houston
Jacksonville
Los Angeles




New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose





Job Search Top Industries



Accounting And Finance
Administrative Support
Business
Computers And Technology
Construction
Customer Service




Education And Training
Engineering
Food And Beverage
Healthcare
Human Resources
Sales





Job Search Top Companies



Amazon
Coca Cola Company
Costco
Fedex
Frito Lay
Google




Postmates
Procter and Gamble
Starbucks
Uber
Walgreens
Walmart






 View All Jobs  





Job Tips



  

Career Tips
You only get out of your career what you put into it.



  

Civic and Volunteer Activities Can Help You Get a Job
It makes you more well-rounded and enhances your appearance through your resume





  

Soft Skills in Demand
You may have skills that are high in demand and not even know it.





 Read All Job Tips  







 Companies




Companies









Amazon
Apple
Chevron Corp
Citibank
Coca Cola




Comcast
Costco
Deloitte
Fedex
General Electric




Google
Hewlett Packard
Hot Topic
Ikea
Kaiser Permanente




Sears
Mcafee
Nike
Nordstrom Rack
Planned Parenthood




Macy's
Starbucks
Uber
Walgreens
Walmart




 View All Companies  







 Resources




Resume Directory
Quintessential
Job Descriptions
Salary Calculator





Top Industries



Architecture
Community and Public Service
Education and Training
Government
Green Jobs
Healthcare




Human Resources
Management
Performing Arts
Science
Skilled Trades
Textile and Apparel




 View All Industries  






Quintessential by livecareer

  

What's your greatest strength?
Your one-stop source for the latest career tools, job search tips, and expert advice.
Read more 



I Am A Student

College Search
College Majors
College Planning
Internships

All Student Resources  

I Am A Career Changer

Career Assessment Tools
Articles
Find Your Career Passion
Quizzes

All Career Change Resources  

I Am A Job Seeker

Career Exploration
Checklist
Career Planning
Blog

All Job Seeker Resources  



Top Job Descriptions



Cashier Job Description
Project Manager Job Description
Accountant Job Description
Administrative Assistant Job Description
Operations Manager Job Description
Account Manager Job Description




Receptionist Job Description
Office Manager Job Description
Business Analyst Job Description
Marketing Manager Job Description
 Executive Assistant Job Description
Sales Associate Job Description




Sales Manager Job Description
Customer Service Job Description
 Sales Representative Job Description
Graphic Designer Job Description
Product Manager Job Description
General Manager Job Description




Data Analyst Job Description
Bookkeeper Job Description




 View All Job Descriptions  


















 
Search 1000s of Real LiveCareer Resumes!



Resumes you're looking for:

!Please provide a type of job or location to search!


Location you want:

!Please fill out this field


Find My Resume









 Thank you for setting up Job Alerts! Please check your inbox for a welcome email to confirm your request. 






LiveCareer
Weathernews, Inc
Order Entry Specialist Resume Example





Resumes in Oklahoma, Data Entry and Word Processing Jobs, Data Entry and Word Processing Jobs in Norman

Weathernews, Inc - Order Entry Specialist Resume Example
Love This Resume?Build Your Own Now



                            Score:
                            70%












XXXX
XXXX






XXXX,
Norman,
OK 
73072 | 
XXX-XXXX-XXX
C: XXX-XXXX-XXX | 
XXXX@XXXX.XXX





Summary


Dynamic Data Entry Specialist skilled in IT environments who works above and beyond expectations to achieve superior results and maintain company-wide data integrity. Over fifteen years experience in high-volume data entry positions handling confidential, specialized, technical and time-sensitive information.




Highlights





Over 60 wpmResults-orientedExcellent communication skillsCustomer service-oriented
10-key by touchStrong problem solverCritical thinkerHelp desk and problem ticket tracking







Accomplishments


Consistently producing 98-100% accuracy while processing high volumes of dataReputation as a leader from management and colleaguesMentoring employees




Experience




Order Entry Specialist

Nov 2012 to 
Current



Weathernews, Inc － 
Norman, 
OK

Entering daily position reports, start and end of voyage reports and urgent updates from captains of ships at seaMonitoring secondary message systems to ensure all reports are found and entered in voyage tracksPrioritizing urgent messages and implementing plans of action along with voyage planners





Senior Production Assistant

Sep 2009 to 
Dec 2012



SoonerVision/Sooner Sports TV － 
Norman, 
OK

Entering statistical information for use on game broadcasts and coaches' shows seen nationwide.Maintaining database of all films and tapes in Athletic Department archives, used to create History of Oklahoma Football DVDs as well as other projects.Establishing mentoring program for new employees, cross-training in camera operation, webcast production and graphicsProducing accurate information with short turnaround time.





PC Support Tech

Mar 2008 to 
Dec 2008



City of Tulsa － 
Tulsa, 
OK

Conducting pre-move interviews with users, problem solving needs or issues arising during or after moveInstalling users' PCs in new workstations in City Hall, using previously gathered data to ensure quality of deployment.Monitoring help desk queue and tracking status of trouble tickets from issue to completion.





Records Entry Specialist

Mar 2006 to 
Jan 2008



US Investigative Services － 
Tulsa, 
OK

Entering criminal records into database and creating reports for client requests.Editing and updating searches and records from remote locations.Training and mentoring new employees and proofing their work.





Desktop Deployment Tech

Feb 2005 to 
Oct 2005



WilTel Communications － 
Tulsa, 
OK

Collecting information from end users and creating order tickets for new PCs to be pre-loaded with all needed programs.Installing new PCs in users' workstations and performing post-deployment troubleshooting as needed.Monitoring special help desk queue, tracking status of trouble tickets from issue to completion.





ITS Support Tech

Jan 2005 to 
Feb 2005



Perot Systems Inc － 
Tulsa, 
OK

Inspecting all Hillcrest Health Systems computers and terminal stations, recording version information for Windows and MS Office programsAssigning and issuing new asset tags and entering all information gathered in database





ITS Administration Support

Sep 2004 to 
Jan 2005



Dollar Thrifty Automotive Group － 
Tulsa, 
OK

Receiving and forwarding orders for new hardware and software from end users to purchasing departmentReceiving shipments, issuing asset tags and prepping equipment for deploymentMaintaining database of all licensed software and issuing installation discs to authorized users





Education




University of Oklahoma － 
Norman, 
OK








Rogers State College － 
Claremore, 
OK











Build Your Own Now


More  Resume Examples:
Featured Resumes:












Data Entry and Word Processing












Data Entry and Word Processing












Data Entry and Word Processing














Data Entry and Word Processing












Data Entry and Word Processing












Data Entry and Word Processing














Data Entry and Word Processing












Data Entry and Word Processing












Data Entry and Word Processing





Previous Next









Featured Jobs in Norman:View More  Norman Jobs





        Get job alerts sent to your inbox for
        
Data Entry and Word Processing.
    






       
        By clicking "Send Job Alerts",I agree to the LiveCareer Terms of Use and Privacy Policy.
    




Advertisement






Resume Overview

Companies Worked For:

Weathernews, IncSoonerVision/Sooner Sports TVCity of TulsaUS Investigative ServicesWilTel CommunicationsPerot Systems IncDollar Thrifty Automotive Group



Job Titles Held:

Order Entry SpecialistSenior Production AssistantPC Support TechRecords Entry SpecialistDesktop Deployment TechITS Support TechITS Administration Support



School Attended

University of OklahomaRogers State College



Degrees





Advertisement







                        Where can I find a Weathernews, Inc Order Entry Specialist resume example in Norman, Oklahoma 73072?
                    

                        This is an actual resume example of a Order Entry Specialist who works in the Data Entry and Word Processing Industry. LiveCareer has 18524 Data Entry and Word Processing resumes in its database. LiveCareer’s Resume Directory contains real resumes created by subscribers using LiveCareer’s Resume Builder.                        
                    










Browse All Resumes







Resume Tools

Resume Builder
Resume Tips
CV Templates
Resume Directory
Resume Samples





Cover Letter 

Cover Letter Builder
Cover Letter Tips
Cover Letter Samples





Mighty Recruiter 

Job Sourcing
Free Job Posting



Company 

Job Listings
Company Directory





Resources 

Quintessential LiveCareer
Education Opportunities





About 

Who We Are
Work Here
Affiliates
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use





Help & Support 

Customer Service/Billing
Contact Us
Frequently Asked Questions









 Language 





English
English (UK)






Español
Français






Italiano
Deutsch






Nederlands
Português
Polski







Customer Service 
 
customerservice@livecareer.com800-652-8430 Mon- Fri 8am - 8pm CST Sat 8am - 5pm CST, Sun 10am - 6pm CST
				  

Stay in touch with us













© 2017, Bold Limited. All rights reserved.


Powered by  


















TFMS Forum in Copenhagen – Weathernews Inc.







































































The 22nd TFMS Forum in Copenhagen
October 6th, 2016



Registration

Minimize Loss Strategy with You

              Due to the excessive supply of ships in the market, the shipping industry has been exposed to a historical recession the last one to two years. It will take some time to recover good market conditions. Weathernews is developing a variety of platform-type-services for the purpose of minimizing the loss in shipping operations. What we would like to discuss in this forum is what could be the strategy to minimize the loss by enhancing operational techniques, in order to overcome the current market environment together.
            











9:00

                                Registration, Coffee & Danish ＋Tour of Museum
                            



10:00
Opening Remarks
Chihito KusabirakiCEOWeathernews


10:15

                                MRV regulations
                                Requirements of EU MRV regulations
                                Challenges for shipping company

Takeshi ShimadaClass NKEEDI Department,General Manager


11:00

                                Coffee Break
                            




11:15

                                Suggested countermeasures
                                Emission Status Monitoring service
                            

                                Hiroaki ShimadaPerformance Monitoring TeamWeathernews
                            


12:00

                                Lunch & Networking
                            







Track 1: Liner Business Optimization







13:30

                                Efforts for the minimization of loss in the container ship operations
                            

                                Capt. Zadok RadeckerNetwork OpimizationZIM
                            


14:00

                                Proposals for loss minimization of container operations
                               ・Safe operation in consideration of sea keeping
                               ・Optimal balance schedule and fuel economy
                               ・Monitoring enhancement during the voyage
                            

                               Amy BuhlChief Operations ManagerWeathernews
                            





Track 2: Operational Cost Reduction for Trampers







13:30

                                Ship performance monitoring and its utilization in operation of bulk and tanker ships
                            

                                Ivana MelilloFleet Performance Managerd'Amico
                            


14:00

                                Proposals for loss minimization of Dry and Tanker operations
                                ・Business planning accuracy enhancement for profit maximization
                                ・Demonstrated speed and consumption analysis in a realtime
                                ・Enhanced en-route performance monitoring tool
                            

                                Jesse Vecchione, Operations Leader
                                Satoru Ueno , Product Development Manager
                                Weathernews














15:00
Open Discussion



15:30
Coffee Break



16:00
Closing Remarks
Thomas Skov, Executive Officer, Weathernews


16:10
Poster Sessions, Drinks

                                1. Weather Accuracy Improvement Initiative
                                2. Safety Enhancement by Share for Gain
                                3. “LOOP” Liner Optimum Operation Platorm
                                4.  ”T-MAX” Tramper Profit Maximization Platorm
                                5.  Polar Routeing with Advanced Ice Forecast Technology 


17:00
Museum closes






Venue and Address






 M/S Maritime Museum of Denmark
                                Ny Kronborgvej 1 DK-3000 Elsinore CVRnr. 64509918
                                TEL：+45 49210685
                            
Contact

                                Lasse Trillingsgaard Urth
                                TEL：+45 2912 6421
                                MAIL：tfms-cph(at)wni.com












News2017 Arctic Sea Ice OutlookWeathernews Second Microsatellite, WNISAT-1R, Successfully LaunchedWeathernews' microsatellite, WNISAT-1R to be launched July 14thJoin us at the 5th Annual Marine Money Geneva Forum, June 15th, 2017!＞ News Archive



















Taiwan Weather - Browse for your location - AccuWeather

























































MY RECENT LOCATIONS°F

New York, NY75°


Miami, FL90°


Los Angeles, CA77°

Browse for your location
































United States

United States









My Recent Countries

United States
China
United Kingdom

More Countries













World
North America
United States
New York
New York







           , °F











My Settings




English (US)
Español
Français
Dansk
Português
Nederlands
Norsk
Italiano
Deutsch
Svenska
Suomi
中文 (HK)
中文 (SIM)
中文 (Taiwan)
Español (Argentina)
Español (Latin America)
Slovenčinu
Romana
Čeština
Magyar
Polski
Català
Português (Brazil)
हिन्दी
русский
عربي
Ελληνικά
English (UK)
日本語
한국어
TÜRKÇE
Français (Canada)
עברית
Slovenski
Українське
Bahasa Indonesia
български
Eesti keeles
Hrvatski
Қазақша
Lietuvių
Latviski
Македонски
Bahasa Melayu
Tagalog
Srpski
ไทย
Tiếng Việt
فارسی
বাংলা
bosanski
íslenska
Kiswahili
اُردُو
Crnogorski
Oʻzbekcha
Azərbaycanca
தமிழ்
ગુજરાતી
ಕನ್ನಡ
తెలుగు
मराठी
ਪੰਜਾਬੀ





°F



°C



























Close

My Recent Countries

United States
China
United Kingdom







Select a Region



Africa
Antarctica
Arctic
Asia
Central America
Europe
Middle East
North America
Oceania
South America












World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 






                            Note: Select a region before finding a country.
                        













World Weather Locations




















Follow us on






Login


















United States
Weather





New York, NY
Local Weather

75°F







Local Weather

Today's Weather
Hourly Forecast
Extended
Weekend
Month Outlook
Current Weather













Personalized Forecasts: Allergies









Radar & Maps

Radar Maps
Satellite Maps
Forecast Maps



News & Video

Weather News
Weather Video
Weather Blogs
Personalities



Extreme Weather

Hurricane Center
Climate Change
Winter Weather
Severe Weather



Social

Social Media
Apps & Downloads
Weather Photos
Weather Forums







Personalized Forecasts 

A.M. Planner

 Driving

 School Day

 Hair Day

 Snow Days


Home & Garden

 D.I.Y.

 Lawn & Garden

 Home Energy

 Entertaining

 Mosquito




Sports & Recreation

 Golf

 Ski

 Hunting

 Fishing

 Running

 Hiking

 Biking

 Sun & Sand

 Sailing




Health

 Cold & Flu

 Allergies

 Respiratory

 Arthritis

 Migraine

 Sinus


Miscellaneous

 Travel

 Astronomy

 Events




Featured Forecast

Allergies

My Favorite Forecasts






My Recent Locations




New York, NY



75°
RealFeel® 91°









Miami, FL



90°
RealFeel® 105°









Los Angeles, CA



77°
RealFeel® 86°

















Home





Radar & Maps




News & Video




Hurricane




Climate




Social




Watch Videos



















Air Quality Alert
...AIR QUALITY ALERT IN EFFECT UNTIL 11 PM EDT ...                                










 Regions
Asia
Taiwan











Changhua




Chiayi City




Chiayi




Hsinchu




Hsinchu City




Hualien




Yilan




Keelung City




Kaohsiung City




Kinmen




Lienchiang




Miaoli




Nantou




New Taipei City




Penghu




Pingtung




Taoyuan City




Tainan City




Taipei City




Taitung




Taichung City




Yunlin





























Taiwan Weather


















































 






























































The AccuWeather Network
New! The AccuWeather Store
The Weather Station by Netatmo
The Weather Station for Smartphone
AccuWeather - Weather for Life
Netatmo Weather Station
Free Weather For Your Site
YourCaster for iOS
Try RadarPro™ Today
New AccuWeather for Android
Site Specific Severe Weather Warnings
Telemet Data Feeds



















AccuWeather.com





















                Custom Search
            














COMPANY
Superior Accuracy in Action
About AccuWeather
Media Kit
Careers
Press
Contact Us




PRODUCTS & SERVICES
Enterprise Solutions
D3 Data Analytics
AccuWeather Network
StoryTeller
Tools for Broadcast
Radio & Newspaper
AccuWeather APIs




APPS & DOWNLOADS
iPhone App
Android App
Windows App
See all Apps & Downloads




SUBSCRIPTION SERVICES
AccuWeather Premium
AccuWeather Professional


Apps & Downloads
Facebook
Follow Us
Watch Us





© 2017 AccuWeather, Inc. All Rights Reserved. AccuWeather.com is a registered trademark of AccuWeather, Inc. Terms of usage under which this service is provided Privacy Statement | Ad Choices






























































Taiwan Weather - AccuWeather.com



























































MY RECENT LOCATIONS°F

New York, NY75°


Miami, FL90°


Los Angeles, CA77°

Browse for your location
































Taiwan

Taiwan









My Recent Countries

Taiwan
United States
China

More Countries













World
Asia
Taiwan
Select a City







           , °F











My Settings




English (US)
Español
Français
Dansk
Português
Nederlands
Norsk
Italiano
Deutsch
Svenska
Suomi
中文 (HK)
中文 (SIM)
中文 (Taiwan)
Español (Argentina)
Español (Latin America)
Slovenčinu
Romana
Čeština
Magyar
Polski
Català
Português (Brazil)
हिन्दी
русский
عربي
Ελληνικά
English (UK)
日本語
한국어
TÜRKÇE
Français (Canada)
עברית
Slovenski
Українське
Bahasa Indonesia
български
Eesti keeles
Hrvatski
Қазақша
Lietuvių
Latviski
Македонски
Bahasa Melayu
Tagalog
Srpski
ไทย
Tiếng Việt
فارسی
বাংলা
bosanski
íslenska
Kiswahili
اُردُو
Crnogorski
Oʻzbekcha
Azərbaycanca
தமிழ்
ગુજરાતી
ಕನ್ನಡ
తెలుగు
मराठी
ਪੰਜਾਬੀ





°F



°C



























Close

My Recent Countries

Taiwan
United States
China







Select a Region



Africa
Antarctica
Arctic
Asia
Central America
Europe
Middle East
North America
Oceania
South America












World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 




World


 






                            Note: Select a region before finding a country.
                        













Weather




















Follow us on






Login


















Taiwan
Weather





Select a City
 















Personalized Forecasts: Allergies









Radar & Maps

Radar Maps
Satellite Maps
Forecast Maps



News & Video

Weather News
Weather Video
Weather Blogs
Personalities



Extreme Weather

Hurricane Center
Climate Change
Winter Weather
Severe Weather



Social

Social Media
Apps & Downloads
Weather Photos
Weather Forums







Personalized Forecasts 

A.M. Planner

 Driving

 School Day

 Hair Day

 Snow Days


Home & Garden

 D.I.Y.

 Lawn & Garden

 Home Energy

 Entertaining

 Mosquito




Sports & Recreation

 Golf

 Ski

 Hunting

 Fishing

 Running

 Hiking

 Biking

 Sun & Sand

 Sailing




Health

 Cold & Flu

 Allergies

 Respiratory

 Arthritis

 Migraine

 Sinus


Miscellaneous

 Travel

 Astronomy

 Events




Featured Forecast

Allergies

My Favorite Forecasts






My Recent Locations




New York, NY



75°
RealFeel® 91°









Miami, FL



90°
RealFeel® 105°









Los Angeles, CA



77°
RealFeel® 86°

















Home



















Air Quality Alert
...AIR QUALITY ALERT IN EFFECT UNTIL 11 PM EDT ...                                


















Taiwan Weather











More Maps
 > 






Local Weather



New York

75°

RealFeel®
                                                            91°
                                                        

Hazy sunshine





Miami

90°

RealFeel®
                                                            105°
                                                        

Partly sunny





Los Angeles

77°

RealFeel®
                                                            86°
                                                        

Sunny































Taiwan Weather Map




+-






More Maps
 > 
























Taiwan Weather Conditions





Banqiao District


84°






Changhua County


81°






Chiayi City


84°






Chiayi County


84°






Fengshan District


81°






Hsinchu City


83°






Hsinchu County


83°






Hualien County


83°






Kaohsiung City


81°






Keelung City


84°








Miaoli County


82°






Nantou County


82°






New Taipei City


84°






Sanchong District


86°






Sanmin District


81°






Taichung City


81°






Tainan City


79°






Taipei City


86°






Taoyuan City


86°






Yilan County


83°






more Taiwan Weather Forecasts
 > 


















































 






























































Telemet Data Feeds
Netatmo Weather Station
AccuWeather - Weather for Life
The AccuWeather Network
Free Weather For Your Site
Try RadarPro™ Today
Site Specific Severe Weather Warnings
New! The AccuWeather Store
New AccuWeather for Android
YourCaster for iOS
The Weather Station by Netatmo
The Weather Station for Smartphone



















AccuWeather.com





















                Custom Search
            














COMPANY
Superior Accuracy in Action
About AccuWeather
Media Kit
Careers
Press
Contact Us




PRODUCTS & SERVICES
Enterprise Solutions
D3 Data Analytics
AccuWeather Network
StoryTeller
Tools for Broadcast
Radio & Newspaper
AccuWeather APIs




APPS & DOWNLOADS
iPhone App
Android App
Windows App
See all Apps & Downloads




SUBSCRIPTION SERVICES
AccuWeather Premium
AccuWeather Professional


Apps & Downloads
Facebook
Follow Us
Watch Us





© 2017 AccuWeather, Inc. All Rights Reserved. AccuWeather.com is a registered trademark of AccuWeather, Inc. Terms of usage under which this service is provided Privacy Statement | Ad Choices



























































